Utah statutes.
31A-29-107.   Powers of commissioner.

(1)  The commissioner shall, after notice and hearing, approve the plan of operation if the commissioner determines that the plan will assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable administration of the pool.

(2)  The plan shall be effective upon the commissioner's written approval.

(3)  If the board fails to submit a proposed plan of operation by January 1, 1991, or any time thereafter fails to submit proposed amendments to the plan of operation within a reasonable time after requested by the commissioner, the commissioner shall, after notice and hearing, adopt such rules as necessary to effectuate the provisions of this chapter.

(4)  Rules promulgated by the commissioner shall continue in force until modified by him or until superseded by a subsequent plan of operation submitted by the board and approved by the commissioner.

(5)  The commissioner may designate an executive secretary from the department to provide administrative assistance to the board in carrying out its responsibilities.

